Connecticut, session 2026, SB00075.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 229 of the general statutes be amended to establish a
caregiver tax credit against the personal income tax of five hundred
dollars for taxpayers who (1) pay or incur expenses for the care and
support of a family member who is fifty years of age or older and
receives Social Security disability benefits or is sixty years of age or
older, and (2) have a federal adjusted gross income of two hundred
thousand dollars or less for single filers and four hundred thousand
dollars or less for married individuals filing jointly.